Tennessee, session 114, SB1790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 41, Chapter 21, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Healthcare prescriber" means a prescriber as defined in § 53-10-
203;
(2) "Insurance policy" means a group or individual insurance plan or
policy offered through this state or a local government, a private insurance
company, a healthcare corporation, a health management organization,
TennCare, or other plan or policy that provides medical or pharmaceutical
coverage to inmates incarcerated in this state;
(3) "Insurer" means an entity that offers an insurance policy; and
(4) "Non-opioid medication" means a drug or biological product that is
indicated to produce analgesia without acting on the body's opioid receptors.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an insurer, for purposes of
offering an insurance policy, may adopt or amend a preferred drug list (PDL).
(c)
(1) In establishing and maintaining the PDL, the insurer shall ensure that
a non-opioid medication approved by the United States food and drug
administration for the treatment or management of pain is not disadvantaged or
SB1790
011195
- 1 -

discouraged with respect to coverage relative to an opioid or narcotic drug for the
treatment or management of pain on the PDL.
(2) Subdivision (c)(1) does not prohibit an opioid medication from being
preferred over other opioid medications, or a non-opioid medication from being
preferred over other non-opioid medications.
(d) This section applies to a non-opioid medication after it has been approved by
the United States food and drug administration for a period of nine (9) months or longer
for the treatment or management of pain, regardless of whether the drug has been
reviewed by the insurer for inclusion on the PDL. This section also applies to drugs
being provided under a contract between the insurer and a pharmacy benefits manager
for purposes of an insurance policy.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011195